Montana, session 2025, HB72.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Section 10-1-502, MCA, is amended to read:
"10-1-502. Pay and allowances. (1) An officer ordered into active duty as provided for in Article VI,
section 13, of the constitution of this state must receive pay and allowances as prescribed for an officer of
corresponding grade and length of service when on active duty in federal service.
(2) A rated aviation officer performing flying duties in support of a state declaration of emergency
or disaster may receive pay at a rate comparable to the pay for other state employees engaged in aerial wildfire
suppression efforts if the adjutant general determines that payment at that rate is appropriate.
(3) An enlisted member ordered into active duty as provided for in Article VI, section 13, of the
constitution of this state must receive pay at rates equivalent to twice those allowed for an enlisted member of
corresponding grade and length of time when on active duty in federal service. This schedule of pay for enlisted
members applies only to the first 15 days of service. After 15 days, an enlisted member must receive the pay
and allowances as prescribed for an enlisted member of corresponding grade and length of service when on
active duty in federal service.
(4) A national guard member placed on state duty for special work, as defined in 10-1-505, must
receive the pay and allowances as prescribed for an officer or enlisted member of corresponding grade and
length of service when on active duty in federal service.
(5) The pay and allowances provided for in subsections (1) and (2) may not be paid when pay and
allowances for the active duty are provided out of federal funds."
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 72
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 72
Section 2. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 72
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 72, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 72
INTRODUCED BY B. BARKER
BY REQUEST OF THE DEPARTMENT OF MILITARY AFFAIRS
AN ACT REVISING ENLISTED MILITIA COMPENSATION FOR STATE ACTIVE DUTY; REMOVING THE 15-
DAY LIMITATION ON COMPENSATION; AMENDING SECTION 10-1-502, MCA; AND PROVIDING AN
IMMEDIATE EFFECTIVE DATE.”